Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.035

Grain dealer license required, exception.

It is unlawful for any person to operate as a grain dealer in the state of Washington without first having obtained an annual license from the department. This chapter does not apply to a grain dealer that is licensed for dealing in agricultural commodities under federal law.

[ 1983 c 305 s 19.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 305: See note following RCW 20.01.010.